Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Milk Marketing Law

260.675.
Title of KRS 260.675 to 260.760. [Repealed.]

260.680.
Definitions for KRS 260.675 to 260.760. [Repealed.]

260.685.
Milk marketing and anti-monopoly commission. [Repealed.]

260.690.
Administration of KRS 260.675 to 260.760. [Repealed.]

260.695.
Only the commission is liable for its obligations. [Repealed.]

260.700.
Commission personnel. [Repealed.]

260.705.
Prohibited marketing practices. [Repealed.]

260.710.
Filing price schedules. [Repealed.]

260.715.
Powers and duties of department. [Repealed.]

260.720.
Copies of department record are admissible. [Repealed.]

260.725.
Powers of department with respect to other governmental agencies. [Repealed.]

260.730.
License for dealers and handlers. [Repealed.]

260.735.
Grounds for suspension, revocation, or refusal to issue license. [Repealed.]

260.740.
Hearing and notice on suspension, revocation, or refusal to issue license — Judicial review. [Repealed.]

260.745.
Appeal from department’s order. [Repealed.]

260.750.
Assessment of dairy products — Confidential nature of information received by department. [Repealed.]

260.755.
Revolving fund. [Repealed.]

260.760.
Injunction. [Repealed.]